Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6059.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that:(a) The social work profession in Washington state maintains a strong fiscal position with a surplus fund balance of $1,310,000 as of fiscal year 2024, demonstrating the financial sustainability necessary to support an independent regulatory board.(b) The establishment of a separate board for licensed social workers will provide enhanced professional oversight, more focused regulatory attention, and improved public protection specific to social work practice.(c) The social work profession has distinct educational requirements, practice standards, and ethical considerations that warrant specialized governance separate from other behavioral health professions.(d) An independent board will strengthen the profession's ability to respond to evolving practice standards, emerging ethical issues, and public protection needs in a timely and effective manner.(e) The three-year transition period will ensure orderly implementation, adequate board training, comprehensive rule making, and seamless transfer of regulatory functions while maintaining continuous public protection.(f) The recommended board composition of seven members, including four licensed independent clinical social workers, two licensed advanced social workers, and one public member, provides appropriate professional representation while ensuring public accountability.(2) The legislature intends to establish the board of governors for licensed social workers to enhance public protection, strengthen professional regulation, and support the continued development of high quality social work practice in Washington state.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.320 RCW to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "Advanced social work" means the application of social work theory and methods, including:(a) Emotional and biopsychosocial assessment;(b) Psychotherapy under the supervision of a licensed independent clinical social worker, psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychiatric nurse, or other mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary;(c) Case management;(d) Consultation;(e) Advocacy;(f) Counseling; or(g) Community organization.(2) "Associate" means a prelicensure candidate who has a graduate degree in a mental health field under section 9 of this act and is gaining the supervision and supervised experience necessary to become a licensed independent clinical social worker, a licensed advanced social worker, a licensed mental health counselor, or a licensed marriage and family therapist.(3) "Board" means the board of governors for licensed social workers.(4) "Department" means the department of health.(5) "Disciplining authority" means the board.(6) "Independent clinical social work" means the diagnosis and treatment of emotional and mental disorders based on knowledge of human development, the causation and treatment of psychopathology, psychotherapeutic treatment practices, and social work practice as defined in advanced social work. Treatment modalities include but are not limited to diagnosis and treatment of individuals, couples, families, groups, or organizations.(7) "Licensed social worker" means a person licensed under this chapter as a social worker, including licensed social workers, licensed advanced social workers, licensed independent clinical social workers, and social worker associates.(8) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 18.320 RCW to read as follows:(1) A board of governors for licensed social workers is established, consisting of seven members appointed by the governor. Four members shall be licensed independent clinical social workers, two members shall be licensed advanced social workers or licensed independent clinical social workers, and one member shall be a member of the public.(2) Members are appointed for five-year terms. No member may serve more than two consecutive full terms. Members hold office until their successors are appointed. The governor may initially appoint the members to staggered terms to ensure an orderly rotation, so that no more than two members' terms expire each year; subsequent appointments are for full five-year terms.(3) The public members of the board may not be and have never been a licensed social worker or in training to be one; may not have any household member who is a licensed social worker or in training to be one; may not participate or have ever participated in a commercial or professional field related to social work, nor have a household member who has so participated; and may not have had, within two years before appointment, a substantial financial interest in a person regulated by the board.(4) Each licensed social worker member shall be licensed under this chapter at the appropriate level and shall have actively practiced social work in the state of Washington for at least three years of the prior five years immediately preceding appointment.(5) The board shall elect officers each year. The board shall meet at least twice each year and may hold additional meetings at the chair's discretion. Meetings of the board are open to the public, except that the board may hold executive sessions to the extent permitted by chapter 42.30 RCW. The department shall provide secretarial, clerical, and other assistance as required by the board.(6) Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240. Members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the actual performance of their duties, as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.(7) A majority of the board members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure.(8) The board may appoint members to panels of at least three members. A quorum for the transaction of any business by a panel is a minimum of three members. A majority vote of a quorum of the panel is required to transact business delegated to it by the board.(9) The board may adopt such rules as are consistent with this chapter as may be deemed necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter.(10) The governor may remove a member of the board for neglect of duty, misconduct, or malfeasance or misfeasance in office. Whenever the governor is satisfied that a member of the board has been guilty of neglect of duty, misconduct, or malfeasance or misfeasance in office, the governor shall file with the secretary of state a statement of the cause for and the order of removal from office, and the secretary shall immediately send a certified copy of the order of removal and statement of causes by certified mail to the last known post office address of the member. If a vacancy occurs on the board, the governor shall appoint a replacement to fill the remainder of the unexpired term.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 18.320 RCW to read as follows:(1) In addition to any other authority provided by law, the board shall:(a) Adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to implement this chapter with respect to licensed social workers;(b) Determine the minimum education and experience requirements for licensure as a licensed social worker at all levels, including approval of educational programs and supervised experience consistent with this chapter;(c) Prepare and administer, or approve the preparation and administration of, examinations for licensure, including acceptance of national examinations consistent with this chapter;(d) Establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of examination failure;(e) Determine whether alternative methods of training are equivalent to formal education, and establish forms, procedures, and criteria for evaluation of an applicant's equivalent alternative training to determine the applicant's eligibility to take the examination;(f) Adopt rules implementing a continuing competency program for licensed social workers, including continuing education requirements;(g) Keep complete records of its proceedings, the names and qualifications of all applicants, and the names and addresses of all licensed social workers;(h) By rule, adopt a code of ethics for licensed social workers designed to protect the public interest;(i) By rule, require that persons licensed as social workers obtain and maintain professional liability insurance in amounts determined by the board to be practicable and reasonably available.(2) In conducting investigations and complaint resolution, the board may obtain the written consent of the complaining client or patient or their legal representative, or of any person who may be affected by the complaint, in order to obtain information which otherwise might be confidential or privileged.(3) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses, and the discipline of licensees under this chapter. For purposes of chapter 18.130 RCW, the board is the disciplining authority for licensed social workers under this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 18.320 RCW to read as follows:In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary has the authority to:(1) Set all license, examination, and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250;(2) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this chapter;(3) Issue a license to any applicant who has met the education, training, and examination requirements for licensure as a licensed social worker, and deny a license to applicants who do not meet the minimum qualifications for licensure, except that denial of licenses based on unprofessional conduct or impaired practice shall be governed by the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;(4) Hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as needed to implement and administer this chapter and to hire individuals, including licensees under this chapter, to serve as examiners or consultants as necessary to implement and administer this chapter;(5) Maintain the official department record of all applicants and licensees; and(6) Conduct a hearing on an appeal of a denial of a license based on the applicant's failure to meet the minimum qualifications for licensure. The hearing shall be conducted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 18.320 RCW to read as follows:The secretary, members of the board, or individuals acting on their behalf, are immune from suit in any civil action based on any act performed in the course of their duties.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 18.320 RCW to read as follows:(1) The date and location of the examination shall be established by the board. Applicants who have been found to meet the education and experience requirements for licensure shall be scheduled for the next examination following the filing of the application. The board shall establish by rule the examination application deadline.(2) The examination shall contain subjects appropriate to the standards of competency and scope of practice for licensed social workers at the applicable level.(3) The board shall establish by rule the requirements for a reexamination if the applicant has failed the examination.(4) The board may approve an examination prepared or administered, or both, by a private testing agency or association of licensing boards.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 18.320 RCW to read as follows:The board shall establish by rule the standards for licensure by endorsement or reciprocity for applicants licensed in another jurisdiction as a licensed social worker or equivalent. The standards for reciprocity of licensure shall not be less than required for licensure in the state of Washington.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. A new section is added to chapter 18.320 RCW to read as follows:(1) The secretary shall issue an associate license in the following categories to any applicant who graduates from a master's degree or doctoral degree educational program in social work accredited by the council on social work education and approved by the secretary based upon nationally recognized standards and submits a declaration that the applicant is working toward full licensure in that category:(a) Licensed social worker associate;(b) Advanced licensed social worker associate; or(c) Independent clinical licensed social work associate.(2) Associates may not provide independent social work for a fee, monetary or otherwise. Associates must work under the supervision of an approved supervisor. An applicant for an associate license under this section may practice without a license under the direct supervision of an approved supervisor for 120 days after the department receives the applicant's completed application or the applicant's license is issued or denied, whichever is sooner.(3) Associates shall provide each client or patient, during the first professional contact, with a disclosure form according to section 10 of this act, disclosing that he or she is an associate under the supervision of an approved supervisor.(4) The board shall adopt by rule what constitutes adequate proof of compliance with the requirements of this section.(5) Applicants are subject to the denial of a license or issuance of a conditional license for the reasons set forth in chapter 18.130 RCW.(6) An associate license may be renewed. The applicant for renewal must have successfully completed, in the preceding year, continuing education requirements established in rule by the board. Beginning with the second renewal, the continuing education requirements established in rule by the board must require the applicant to complete a minimum number of continuing education hours in the preceding two years in professional ethics.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. A new section is added to chapter 18.320 RCW to read as follows:A person licensed under this chapter must provide clients at the commencement of any program of treatment with accurate disclosure information concerning the practice, in accordance with rules adopted by the board, including the right of clients to refuse treatment, the responsibility of clients to choose the provider and treatment modality which best suits their needs, and the extent of confidentiality provided by this chapter. The disclosure information must also include the license holder's professional education and training, the therapeutic orientation of the practice, the proposed course of treatment where known, financial requirements, and such other information as required by rule. The disclosure must be acknowledged in writing by the client and license holder.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 11. A new section is added to chapter 18.320 RCW to read as follows:A person licensed under this chapter shall not disclose the written acknowledgment of the disclosure statement pursuant to section 10 of this act, nor any information acquired from persons consulting the individual in a professional capacity when the information was necessary to enable the individual to render professional services to those persons except:(1) With the written authorization of that person or, in the case of death or disability, the person's personal representative;(2) If the person waives the privilege by bringing charges against the person licensed under this chapter;(3) In response to a subpoena from the secretary. The secretary may subpoena only records related to a complaint or report under RCW 18.130.050;(4) As required under chapter 26.44 or 74.34 RCW or RCW 71.05.217 (6) and (7);(5) When disclosure of health care information is permitted under chapter 70.02 RCW; or(6) To any individual if the person licensed under this chapter reasonably believes that disclosure will avoid or minimize an imminent danger to the health or safety of the individual or any other individual; however, there is no obligation on the part of the provider to so disclose.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 12. A new section is added to chapter 18.320 RCW to read as follows:A person must not represent himself or herself as a licensed advanced social worker, a licensed independent clinical social worker, a licensed social work associate, a licensed social work associateâadvanced, or a licensed social work associateâindependent clinical without being licensed by the department.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 13. A new section is added to chapter 18.320 RCW to read as follows:The provisions of this act are intended to be construed consistently with chapter 18.320 RCW. To the extent of any conflict between a rule of the board and a rule of the department relating to licensed social workers, the rule of the board controls.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 14. A new section is added to chapter 18.320 RCW to read as follows:(1) Until such time as the board is fully constituted, has completed its initial rule making, adopted rules, and has assumed full regulatory authority, the secretary shall continue to exercise regulatory authority over licensed social workers under existing administrative rules and chapter 18.225 RCW. This temporary authority shall expire no later than three years from the effective date of this section, or upon the board's assumption of full regulatory authority, whichever occurs first.(2) Until such time as the board is fully constituted, has completed its initial rule making, adopted rules, and has assumed full regulatory authority, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to conflict with chapter 18.225 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 15. A new section is added to chapter 18.320 RCW to read as follows:The department shall provide an annual fiscal report to the legislature on the financial status of the social work licensing program and board operations.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 16. A new section is added to chapter 18.320 RCW to read as follows:(1) Within six months of July 1, 2026, the governor shall appoint initial board members as provided in section 3 of this act.(2) Within nine months of July 1, 2026, the board shall hold its first meeting and elect officers.(3) Within 18 months of July 1, 2026, the board shall complete initial rule making necessary to assume regulatory authority.(4) Within 36 months of July 1, 2026, the board shall adopt rules to assume full regulatory authority over licensed social workers, including all disciplinary functions.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 17. A new section is added to chapter 18.320 RCW to read as follows:The board shall promulgate rules relating to issuance of a retired active license under RCW 18.130.250 for advanced social workers and independent clinical social workers.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 18. A new section is added to chapter 18.320 RCW to read as follows:If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the chapter or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.Sec. 19. RCW 18.320.005 and 2011 c 89 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The legislature finds that:(a) The practice of social work by persons in the public and private sectors improves the lives of many people throughout the state through the application of a broad spectrum of social sciences to enhance the quality of life and develop the full potential of each client;(b) The practice of social work is a complex discipline that, appropriately undertaken, can address client problems, needs, and concerns, with the goal that clients achieve the maximum possible enhancement of their quality of life and develop to their full potential. However, improper assessment of client problems and needs by unqualified persons can lead to client harm;(c) It is in the state's interest to take steps to safeguard state residents from misrepresentations about qualifications for practicing social work. Because such misrepresentations could lead to the improper practice of social work by unqualified persons, those who represent themselves as social workers should have a qualifying degree from an accredited and approved social work program.(2) The legislature declares that chapter 89, Laws of 2011 to regulate social workers constitutes an exercise of the state's police power to protect and promote the health, safety, and welfare of the residents of the state in general. Accordingly, while chapter 89, Laws of 2011 is intended to protect the public generally, it does not create a duty owed by the state or its instrumentalities to any individual or entity.(3) The legislature further finds that licensed advanced social workers and licensed independent clinical social workers represent different specializations within the social work profession, with each license signifying the highest degree of licensure as it pertains to each specialty. The legislature further finds that practitioners in each specialty exercise independent judgment and operate independently within their area of practice.(4) Therefore, for purposes of job classification, licensed advanced social workers and licensed independent clinical social workers licensed under this chapter shall both be considered the top tier of licensure for the profession.Sec. 20. RCW 18.130.040 and 2025 c 360 s 4, 2025 c 66 s 1, and 2025 c 5 s 19 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters specified in this section.(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation to the following professions:(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under chapter 18.34 RCW;(ii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;(iii) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;(iv) Massage therapists and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108 RCW;(v) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;(vi) Acupuncturists or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioners licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;(vii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;(viii) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW;(ix) Hypnotherapists registered, agency affiliated counselors registered, certified, or licensed, and advisors and counselors certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;(x) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, mental health counselor associates, marriage and family therapists, and marriage and family therapist associates((, social workers, social work associatesâadvanced, and social work associatesâindependent clinical)) under chapter 18.225 RCW;(xi) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter 18.52C RCW;(xii) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138 RCW;(xiii) Substance use disorder professionals, substance use disorder professional trainees, or co-occurring disorder specialists certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;(xiv) Sex offender treatment providers and certified affiliate sex offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;(xv) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or RCW 18.71.205;(xvi) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW;(xvii) Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW;(xviii) Recreational therapists under chapter 18.230 RCW;(xix) Animal massage therapists certified under chapter 18.240 RCW;(xx) Athletic trainers licensed under chapter 18.250 RCW;(xxi) Home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B RCW;(xxii) Genetic counselors licensed under chapter 18.290 RCW;(xxiii) Reflexologists certified under chapter 18.108 RCW;(xxiv) Medical assistants-certified, medical assistants-hemodialysis technician, medical assistants-phlebotomist, forensic phlebotomist, medical assistant-EMT, and medical assistants-registered certified and registered under chapter 18.360 RCW;(xxv) Behavior analysts, assistant behavior analysts, and behavior technicians under chapter 18.380 RCW;(xxvi) Birth doulas certified under chapter 18.47 RCW;(xxvii) Music therapists licensed under chapter 18.233 RCW;(xxviii) Behavioral health support specialists certified under chapter 18.227 RCW; ((and))(xxix) Certified peer support specialists and certified peer support specialist trainees under chapter 18.420 RCW; and(xxx) Persons licensed as social workers, social work associatesâadvanced, and social work associatesâindependent clinical under chapter 18.320 RCW.(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter are as follows:(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22 RCW;(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.25 RCW;(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.32 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.32 RCW, licenses and registrations issued under chapter 18.260 RCW, licenses issued under chapter 18.265 RCW, and certifications issued under chapter 18.350 RCW;(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter 18.35 RCW;(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as established in chapter 18.52 RCW;(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.57 RCW;(viii) The pharmacy quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.64 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;(ix) The Washington medical commission as established in chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under chapters 18.71, 18.71A, 18.71B, 18.71C, and 18.71D RCW;(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74 RCW;(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in chapter 18.59 RCW;(xii) The board of nursing as established in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under that chapter and under chapter 18.80 RCW, and nursing assistants registered or certified or medication assistants endorsed under chapter 18.88A RCW;(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW;(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter 18.92 RCW;(xv) The board of naturopathy established in chapter 18.36A RCW, governing licenses and certifications issued under that chapter; ((and))(xvi) The board of denturists established in chapter 18.30 RCW; and(xvii) The board of governors for licensed social workers established in chapter 18.320 RCW.(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses. The disciplining authority may also grant a license subject to conditions, which must be in compliance with chapter 18.415 RCW.(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure substantially consistent application of this chapter, the uniform disciplinary act, among the disciplining authorities listed in subsection (2) of this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 21. RCW 18.225.005 (Findings) and 2013 c 73 s 1 are each repealed.Sec. 22. RCW 18.225.010 and 2025 c 58 s 5082 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) (("Advanced social work" means the application of social work theory and methods, including:(a) Emotional and biopsychosocial assessment;(b) Psychotherapy under the supervision of a licensed independent clinical social worker, psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, psychiatric nurse, or other mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary;(c) Case management;(d) Consultation;(e) Advocacy;(f) Counseling; or(g) Community organization.(2))) "Applicant" means a person who completes the required application, pays the required fee, is at least ((eighteen))18 years of age, and meets any background check requirements and uniform disciplinary act requirements.(((3)))(2) "Associate" means a prelicensure candidate who has a graduate degree in a mental health field under RCW 18.225.090 and is gaining the supervision and supervised experience necessary to become ((a licensed independent clinical social worker, a licensed advanced social worker,)) a licensed mental health counselor((,)) or a licensed marriage and family therapist.(((4)))(3) "Committee" means the Washington state mental health counselors((,))and marriage and family therapists((, and social workers)) advisory committee.(((5)))(4) "Department" means the department of health.(((6)))(5) "Disciplining authority" means the department.(((7) "Independent clinical social work" means the diagnosis and treatment of emotional and mental disorders based on knowledge of human development, the causation and treatment of psychopathology, psychotherapeutic treatment practices, and social work practice as defined in advanced social work. Treatment modalities include but are not limited to diagnosis and treatment of individuals, couples, families, groups, or organizations.(8)))(6) "Marriage and family therapy" means the diagnosis and treatment of mental and emotional disorders, whether cognitive, affective, or behavioral, within the context of relationships, including marriage and family systems. Marriage and family therapy involves the professional application of psychotherapeutic and family systems theories and techniques in the delivery of services to individuals, couples, and families for the purpose of treating such diagnosed nervous and mental disorders. The practice of marriage and family therapy means the rendering of professional marriage and family therapy services to individuals, couples, and families, singly or in groups, whether such services are offered directly to the general public or through organizations, either public or private, for a fee, monetary or otherwise.(((9)))(7) "Mental health counseling" means the application of principles of human development, learning theory, psychotherapy, group dynamics, and etiology of mental illness and dysfunctional behavior to individuals, couples, families, groups, and organizations, for the purpose of treatment of mental disorders and promoting optimal mental health and functionality. Mental health counseling also includes, but is not limited to, the assessment, diagnosis, and treatment of mental and emotional disorders, as well as the application of a wellness model of mental health.(((10)))(8) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.Sec. 23. RCW 18.225.020 and 2008 c 135 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:A person must not represent himself or herself as ((a licensed advanced social worker, a licensed independent clinical social worker,)) a licensed mental health counselor, a licensed marriage and family therapist, ((a licensed social work associateâadvanced, a licensed social work associateâindependent clinical,)) a licensed mental health counselor associate, or a licensed marriage and family therapist associate, without being licensed by the department.Sec. 24. RCW 18.225.030 and 2001 c 251 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit or restrict:(1) The practice of marriage and family therapy((,))or mental health counseling((, or social work)) by an individual otherwise regulated under this title and performing services within the authorized scope of practice;(2) The practice of marriage and family therapy((,))or mental health counseling((, or social work)) by an individual employed by the government of the United States or state of Washington while engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by the laws of the United States or state of Washington;(3) The practice of marriage and family therapy((,))or mental health counseling((, or social work)) by a person who is a regular student in an educational program based on recognized national standards and approved by the secretary, and whose performance of services is pursuant to a regular course of instruction or assignments from an instructor and under the general supervision of the instructor;(4) The practice of marriage and family therapy((,))or mental health counseling((, or social work)) under the auspices of a religious denomination, church, or religious organization.Sec. 25. RCW 18.225.060 and 2025 c 20 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The Washington state mental health counselors((,))and marriage and family therapists((, and social workers)) advisory committee is established.(1) The committee shall be comprised of ((nine))seven members as follows:(a) ((Two))Three members must be licensed mental health counselors;(b) ((Two))Three members must be licensed marriage and family therapists; and(c) ((One member must be a licensed independent clinical social worker;(d) One member must be either a licensed advanced social worker or a licensed independent clinical social worker; and(e) Three members must be consumers))One member must be a consumer and represent the public at large and may not be a licensed mental health care ((providers))provider.(2) Three members shall be appointed for a term of one year, three members shall be appointed for a term of two years, and three members shall be appointed for a term of three years. Subsequent members shall be appointed for terms of three years. A person must not serve as a member for more than two consecutive terms.(3)(a) Each member must be a resident of the state of Washington.(b) Each member must not hold a governing office or board position in a professional association for mental health((, social work,)) or marriage and family therapy and must not be employed by the state of Washington.(c) Each professional member must have been actively engaged as a mental health counselor((,))or marriage and family therapist((, or social worker)) for five years immediately preceding appointment.(d) The consumer members must represent the general public and be unaffiliated directly or indirectly with the professions licensed under this chapter.(4) The secretary shall appoint the committee members.(5) Committee members are immune from suit in an action, civil or criminal, based on the department's disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed in good faith.(6) Committee members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240, including travel expenses in carrying out his or her authorized duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.(7) The committee shall elect a chair and vice chair.Sec. 26. RCW 18.225.070 and 2001 c 251 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:The department of health may seek the advice and assistance of the advisory committee in administering this chapter, including, but not limited to:(1) Advice and recommendations regarding the establishment or implementation of rules related to the administration of this chapter;(2) Advice, recommendations, and consultation regarding case disposition guidelines and priorities related to unprofessional conduct cases regarding licensed mental health counselors((, licensed clinical social workers, licensed advanced social workers,)) and licensed marriage and family therapists;(3) Assistance and consultation of individual committee members as needed in the review, analysis, and disposition of reports of unprofessional conduct and consumer complaints;(4) Assistance and recommendations to enhance consumer education; and(5) Assistance and recommendations regarding any continuing education and continuing competency programs administered under the provisions of ((the [this]))this chapter.Sec. 27. RCW 18.225.090 and 2025 c 58 s 1003 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The secretary shall issue a license to any applicant who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the secretary that the applicant meets the following education and experience requirements for the applicant's practice area.(a) ((Licensed social work classifications:(i) Licensed advanced social worker:(A) Graduation from a master's social work educational program accredited by the council on social work education or a social work doctorate program at a university accredited by a recognized accrediting organization, and approved by the secretary based upon nationally recognized standards;(B) Successful completion of an approved examination;(C) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement. The supervised experience requirement consists of a minimum of 3,000 hours with supervision by an approved supervisor who has been licensed for at least two years. Of those supervised hours:(I) At least 90 hours must include direct supervision as specified in this subsection by a licensed independent clinical social worker, a licensed advanced social worker, or an equally qualified licensed mental health professional. Of those hours of directly supervised experience at least 40 hours must be in one-to-one supervision and 50 hours may be in one-to-one supervision or group supervision; and(II) 800 hours must be in direct client contact; and(D) Successful completion of continuing education requirements established in rule by the secretary in consultation with the committee, including a minimum number of hours in professional ethics.(ii) Licensed independent clinical social worker:(A) Graduation from a master's level social work educational program accredited by the council on social work education or a social work doctorate program at a university accredited by a recognized accrediting organization, and approved by the secretary based upon nationally recognized standards;(B) Successful completion of an approved examination;(C) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement. The supervised experience requirement consists of a minimum of 3,000 hours of experience, over a period of not less than two years, with supervision by an approved supervisor who has been licensed for at least two years and, as specified in this subsection, may be either a licensed independent clinical social worker who has had at least one year of experience in supervising the clinical social work of others or an equally qualified licensed mental health practitioner. Of those supervised hours:(I) At least 1,000 hours must be direct client contact; and(II) Hours of direct supervision must include:(1) At least 100 hours by a licensed mental health practitioner;(2) At least 70 hours of supervision with a licensed independent clinical social worker meeting the qualifications under this subsection (1)(a)(ii)(C); the remaining hours may be supervised by an equally qualified licensed mental health practitioner; and(3) At least 60 hours must be in one-to-one supervision and the remaining hours may be in one-to-one supervision or group supervision; and(D) Successful completion of continuing education requirements established in rule by the secretary in consultation with the committee, including a minimum number of hours in professional ethics.(b))) Licensed mental health counselor:(i)(A) Graduation from a master's or doctoral level educational program in counseling that consists of at least 60 semester hours or 90 quarter hours, or includes at least 60 semester hours or 90 quarter hours of graduate coursework that includes the following topic areas:(I) Mental health counseling orientation and ethical practice;(II) Social and cultural diversity;(III) Human growth and development;(IV) Career development;(V) Counseling and helping relationships;(VI) Group counseling and group work;(VII) Diagnosis and treatment;(VIII) Assessment and testing; and(IX) Research and program evaluation; or(B) Graduation from a master's or doctoral level educational program in a related discipline from a college or university approved by the secretary based upon nationally recognized standards. An applicant who satisfies the educational requirements for licensure under this subsection (1)(((b)))(a)(i)(B) is not qualified to exercise the privilege to practice under the counseling compact established in chapter 18.17 RCW unless the master's or doctoral level educational program in a related discipline consists of at least 60 semester hours or 90 quarter hours, or includes at least 60 semester hours or 90 quarter hours of graduate coursework that includes the topic areas specified in (((b)))(a)(i)(A)(I) through (IX) of this subsection;(ii) Successful completion of an approved examination;(iii) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement. The experience requirement consists of a minimum of 36 months full-time counseling or 3,000 hours of postgraduate mental health counseling under the supervision of a qualified licensed mental health counselor or equally qualified licensed mental health practitioner, in an approved setting. The 3,000 hours of required experience includes a minimum of 100 hours spent in immediate supervision with the qualified licensed mental health counselor, and includes a minimum of 1,200 hours of direct counseling with individuals, couples, families, or groups; and(iv) Successful completion of continuing education requirements established in rule by the secretary in consultation with the committee, including a minimum number of hours in professional ethics.(((c)))(b) Licensed marriage and family therapist:(i) Graduation from a master's degree or doctoral degree educational program in marriage and family therapy or graduation from an educational program in an allied field equivalent to a master's degree or doctoral degree in marriage and family therapy approved by the secretary based upon nationally recognized standards;(ii) Successful passage of an approved examination;(iii) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement. The experience requirement consists of a minimum of 3,000 hours of marriage and family therapy. Of the total supervision, 100 hours must be with a licensed marriage and family therapist with at least two years' clinical experience; the other 100 hours may be with an equally qualified licensed mental health practitioner. Total experience requirements include:(A) 1,000 hours of direct client contact; at least 500 hours must be gained in diagnosing and treating couples and families; plus(B) At least 200 hours of qualified supervision with a supervisor. At least 100 of the 200 hours must be one-on-one supervision, and the remaining hours may be in one-on-one or group supervision.Applicants who have completed a master's program accredited by the commission on accreditation for marriage and family therapy education of the American association for marriage and family therapy may be credited with 500 hours of direct client contact and 100 hours of formal meetings with an approved supervisor; and(iv) Successful completion of continuing education requirements established in rule by the secretary in consultation with the committee, including a minimum number of hours in professional ethics.(2) The department shall establish by rule what constitutes adequate proof of meeting the criteria. Only rules in effect on the date of submission of a completed application of an associate for her or his license shall apply. If the rules change after a completed application is submitted but before a license is issued, the new rules shall not be reason to deny the application.(3) In addition, applicants shall be subject to the grounds for denial of a license or issuance of a conditional license under chapter 18.130 RCW.Sec. 28. RCW 18.225.130 and 2001 c 251 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:Any person certified under chapter 18.19 RCW who has met the applicable experience and education requirements under chapter 18.19 RCW prior to July 22, 2001, is eligible for a license as ((an advanced social worker, an independent clinical social worker,)) a marriage and family therapist((,)) or a mental health counselor under this chapter without taking the examination.Sec. 29. RCW 18.225.140 and 2023 c 425 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) An applicant holding a credential in another state may be licensed to practice in this state without examination if the secretary determines that the other state's credentialing standards are substantially equivalent to the licensing standards in this state.(2)(a)(i) The department shall establish a reciprocity program for applicants for licensure as ((an advanced social worker, an independent clinical social worker,)) a mental health counselor((,)) or a marriage and family therapist in Washington.(ii) The reciprocity program applies to applicants for a license as ((an advanced social worker, an independent clinical social worker,)) a mental health counselor((,)) or a marriage and family therapist who:(A) Hold or have held within the past 12 months a credential in good standing from another state or territory of the United States which has a scope of practice that is substantially equivalent to or greater than the scope of practice for the corresponding license as established under this chapter; and(B) Have no disciplinary record or disqualifying criminal history.(b) The department shall issue a probationary license to an applicant who meets the requirements of (a)(ii) of this subsection. The department must determine what deficiencies, if any, exist between the education and experience requirements of the other state's credential and, after consideration of the experience and capabilities of the applicant, determine whether it is appropriate to require the applicant to complete additional education or experience requirements to maintain the probationary license and, within a reasonable time period, transition to a full license. The department may place a reasonable time limit on a probationary license and may, if appropriate, require the applicant to pass a jurisprudential examination.(c) The department must maintain and publish a list of credentials in other states and territories that the department has determined to have a scope of practice that is substantially equivalent to or greater than the scope of practice for licensed advanced social workers, independent clinical social workers, mental health counselors, or marriage and family therapists as established under this chapter. The department shall prioritize identifying and publishing the department's determination for the five states or territories that have historically had the most applicants for reciprocity under subsection (1) of this section with a scope of practice that is substantially equivalent to or greater than the scope of practice for ((licensed advanced social workers, independent clinical social workers,)) mental health counselors((,)) and marriage and family therapists under this chapter.Sec. 30. RCW 18.225.145 and 2024 c 371 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The secretary shall issue an associate license to any applicant who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the secretary that the applicant meets the following requirements for the applicant's practice area and submits a declaration that the applicant is working toward full licensure in that category:(a) ((Licensed social worker associateâadvanced or licensed social worker associateâindependent clinical: Graduation from a master's degree or doctoral degree educational program in social work accredited by the council on social work education and approved by the secretary based upon nationally recognized standards.(b))) Licensed mental health counselor associate: Graduation from a master's degree or doctoral degree educational program in mental health counseling or a related discipline from a college or university approved by the secretary based upon nationally recognized standards.(((c)))(b) Licensed marriage and family therapist associate: Graduation from a master's degree or doctoral degree educational program in marriage and family therapy or graduation from an educational program in an allied field equivalent to a master's degree or doctoral degree in marriage and family therapy approved by the secretary based upon nationally recognized standards.(2) Associates may not provide independent ((social work,)) mental health counseling((,)) or marriage and family therapy for a fee, monetary or otherwise. Associates must work under the supervision of an approved supervisor. Beginning October 1, 2025, an applicant for an associate license under this section may practice without a license under the direct supervision of an approved supervisor for 120 days after the department receives the applicant's completed application or the applicant's license is issued or denied, whichever is sooner.(3) Associates shall provide each client or patient, during the first professional contact, with a disclosure form according to RCW 18.225.100, disclosing that he or she is an associate under the supervision of an approved supervisor.(4) The department shall adopt by rule what constitutes adequate proof of compliance with the requirements of this section.(5) Applicants are subject to the denial of a license or issuance of a conditional license for the reasons set forth in chapter 18.130 RCW.(6)(a) An associate license may be renewed. Until October 1, 2025, the applicant for renewal must have successfully completed ((eighteen))18 hours of continuing education in the preceding year. After October 1, 2025, the applicant for renewal must have successfully completed, in the preceding year, continuing education requirements established in rule by the secretary in consultation with the committee. Beginning with the second renewal, the continuing education requirements established in rule by the secretary in consultation with the committee must require the applicant to complete a minimum number of continuing education hours in the preceding two years in professional ethics.(b) A person whose associate license was not renewed due to the person exceeding the six-renewal limit in place prior to June 6, 2024, shall be treated as if the person's license expired. The secretary shall allow such a person to return the person's associate license to active status pursuant to standard rules and procedures in place for returning an expired credential to active status.Sec. 31. RCW 18.225.170 and 2012 c 58 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The secretary of the department of health shall promulgate rules relating to issuance of a retired active license under RCW 18.130.250 for mental health counselors((,))and marriage and family therapists((, advanced social workers, and independent clinical social workers)).Sec. 32. RCW 5.60.060 and 2025 c 346 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A spouse or domestic partner shall not be examined for or against his or her spouse or domestic partner, without the consent of the spouse or domestic partner; nor can either during marriage or during the domestic partnership or afterward, be without the consent of the other, examined as to any communication made by one to the other during the marriage or the domestic partnership. But this exception shall not apply to a civil action or proceeding by one against the other, nor to a criminal action or proceeding for a crime committed by one against the other, nor to a criminal action or proceeding against a spouse or domestic partner if the marriage or the domestic partnership occurred subsequent to the filing of formal charges against the defendant, nor to a criminal action or proceeding for a crime committed by said spouse or domestic partner against any child of whom said spouse or domestic partner is the parent or guardian, nor to a proceeding under chapter 71.05 or 71.09 RCW: PROVIDED, That the spouse or the domestic partner of a person sought to be detained under chapter 71.05 or 71.09 RCW may not be compelled to testify and shall be so informed by the court prior to being called as a witness.(2)(a) An attorney or counselor shall not, without the consent of his or her client, be examined as to any communication made by the client to him or her, or his or her advice given thereon in the course of professional employment.(b) A parent or guardian of a minor child arrested on a criminal charge may not be examined as to a communication between the child and his or her attorney if the communication was made in the presence of the parent or guardian. This privilege does not extend to communications made prior to the arrest.(3) A member of the clergy, a Christian Science practitioner listed in the Christian Science Journal, or a priest shall not, without the consent of a person making the confession or sacred confidence, be examined as to any confession or sacred confidence made to him or her in his or her professional character, in the course of discipline enjoined by the church to which he or she belongs.(4) Subject to the limitations under RCW 71.05.217 (6) and (7), a physician or surgeon or osteopathic physician or surgeon or podiatric physician or surgeon shall not, without the consent of his or her patient, be examined in a civil action as to any information acquired in attending such patient, which was necessary to enable him or her to prescribe or act for the patient, except as follows:(a) In any judicial proceedings regarding a child's injury, neglect, or sexual abuse or the cause thereof; and(b) Ninety days after filing an action for personal injuries or wrongful death, the claimant shall be deemed to waive the physician-patient privilege. Waiver of the physician-patient privilege for any one physician or condition constitutes a waiver of the privilege as to all physicians or conditions, subject to such limitations as a court may impose pursuant to court rules.(5) A public officer shall not be examined as a witness as to communications made to him or her in official confidence, when the public interest would suffer by the disclosure.(6)(a) A peer supporter shall not, without consent of the peer support services recipient making the communication, be compelled to testify about any communication made to the peer supporter by the peer support services recipient while receiving individual or group services. The peer supporter must be designated as such by their employing agency prior to providing peer support services. The privilege only applies when the communication was made to the peer supporter while acting in his or her capacity as a peer supporter. The privilege applies regardless of whether the peer support services recipient is an employee of the same agency as the peer supporter. Peer support services may be coordinated or designated among first responder agencies pursuant to chapter 10.93 RCW, interlocal agreement, or other similar provision, provided however that a written agreement is not required for the privilege to apply. The privilege does not apply if the peer supporter was an initial responding first responder, department of corrections staff person, or jail staff person; a witness; or a party to the incident which prompted the delivery of peer support services to the peer support services recipient.(b) For purposes of this section:(i) "First responder" means:(A) A law enforcement officer;(B) A limited authority law enforcement officer;(C) A firefighter;(D) An emergency services dispatcher or recordkeeper;(E) Emergency medical personnel, as licensed or certified by this state;(F) A member or former member of the Washington national guard acting in an emergency response capacity pursuant to chapter 38.52 RCW;(G) A coroner or medical examiner, or a coroner's or medical examiner's agent or employee; or(H) An individual engaged in co-response services, as defined in RCW 71.24.025.(ii) "Law enforcement officer" means a general authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020.(iii) "Limited authority law enforcement officer" means a limited authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020 who is employed by the department of corrections, state parks and recreation commission, department of natural resources, liquor and cannabis board, or Washington state gambling commission.(iv) "Peer support services recipient" means:(A) A first responder;(B) A department of corrections staff person; or(C) A jail staff person.(v) "Peer supporter" means:(A) A first responder, retired first responder, department of corrections staff person, or jail staff person or a civilian employee of a first responder entity or agency, local jail, or state agency who has received training to provide emotional and moral support and services to a peer support services recipient who needs those services as a result of an incident or incidents in which the peer support services recipient was involved while acting in his or her official capacity or to deal with other stress that is impacting the peer support services recipient's performance of official duties; or(B) A nonemployee who has been designated by the first responder entity or agency, local jail, statewide organization focused on co-response outreach, or state agency to provide emotional and moral support and counseling to a peer support services recipient who needs those services as a result of an incident or incidents in which the peer support services recipient was involved while acting in his or her official capacity.(7) A sexual assault advocate may not, without the consent of the victim, be examined as to any communication made between the victim and the sexual assault advocate.(a) For purposes of this section, "sexual assault advocate" means the employee or volunteer from a community sexual assault program or underserved populations provider, victim assistance unit, program, or association, that provides information, medical or legal advocacy, counseling, or support to victims of sexual assault, who is designated by the victim to accompany the victim to the hospital or other health care facility and to proceedings concerning the alleged assault, including police and prosecution interviews and court proceedings.(b) A sexual assault advocate may disclose a confidential communication without the consent of the victim if failure to disclose is likely to result in a clear, imminent risk of serious physical injury or death of the victim or another person. Any sexual assault advocate participating in good faith in the disclosing of records and communications under this section shall have immunity from any liability, civil, criminal, or otherwise, that might result from the action. In any proceeding, civil or criminal, arising out of a disclosure under this section, the good faith of the sexual assault advocate who disclosed the confidential communication shall be presumed.(8) A domestic violence advocate may not, without the consent of the victim, be examined as to any communication between the victim and the domestic violence advocate.(a) For purposes of this section, "domestic violence advocate" means an employee or supervised volunteer from a community-based domestic violence program or human services program that provides information, advocacy, counseling, crisis intervention, emergency shelter, or support to victims of domestic violence and who is not employed by, or under the direct supervision of, a law enforcement agency, a prosecutor's office, or the child protective services section of the department of children, youth, and families as defined in RCW 26.44.020.(b) A domestic violence advocate may disclose a confidential communication without the consent of the victim if failure to disclose is likely to result in a clear, imminent risk of serious physical injury or death of the victim or another person. This section does not relieve a domestic violence advocate from the requirement to report or cause to be reported an incident under RCW 26.44.030(1) or to disclose relevant records relating to a child as required by RCW 26.44.030(15). Any domestic violence advocate participating in good faith in the disclosing of communications under this subsection is immune from liability, civil, criminal, or otherwise, that might result from the action. In any proceeding, civil or criminal, arising out of a disclosure under this subsection, the good faith of the domestic violence advocate who disclosed the confidential communication shall be presumed.(9) A mental health counselor((, independent clinical social worker,)) or marriage and family therapist licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW or an independent clinical social worker licensed under chapter 18.320 RCW may not disclose, or be compelled to testify about, any information acquired from persons consulting the individual in a professional capacity when the information was necessary to enable the individual to render professional services to those persons except:(a) With the written authorization of that person or, in the case of death or disability, the person's personal representative;(b) If the person waives the privilege by bringing charges against the mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;(c) In response to a subpoena from the secretary of health. The secretary may subpoena only records related to a complaint or report under RCW 18.130.050;(d) As required under chapter 26.44 or 74.34 RCW or RCW 71.05.217 (6) or (7); or(e) To any individual if the mental health counselor((, independent clinical social worker,)) or marriage and family therapist licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW reasonably believes that disclosure will avoid or minimize an imminent danger to the health or safety of the individual or any other individual; however, there is no obligation on the part of the provider to so disclose.(10) An individual who acts as a sponsor providing guidance, emotional support, and counseling in an individualized manner to a person participating in an alcohol or drug addiction recovery fellowship may not testify in any civil action or proceeding about any communication made by the person participating in the addiction recovery fellowship to the individual who acts as a sponsor except with the written authorization of that person or, in the case of death or disability, the person's personal representative.(11)(a) Neither a union representative nor an employee the union represents or has represented shall be examined as to, or be required to disclose, any communication between an employee and union representative or between union representatives made in the course of union representation except:(i) To the extent such examination or disclosure appears necessary to prevent the commission of a crime that is likely to result in a clear, imminent risk of serious physical injury or death of a person;(ii) In actions, civil or criminal, in which the represented employee is accused of a crime or assault or battery;(iii) In actions, civil or criminal, where a union member is a party to the action, the union member may obtain a copy of any statement previously given by that union member concerning the subject matter of the action and may elicit testimony concerning such statements. The right of the union member to obtain such statements, or the union member's possession of such statements, does not render them discoverable over the objection of the union member;(iv) In actions, regulatory, civil, or criminal, against the union or its affiliated, subordinate, or parent bodies or their agents; or(v) When an admission of, or intent to engage in, criminal conduct is revealed by the represented union member to the union representative.(b) The privilege created in this subsection (11) does not apply to any record of communications that would otherwise be subject to disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.(c) The privilege created in this subsection (11) may not interfere with an employee's or union representative's applicable statutory mandatory reporting requirements, including but not limited to duties to report in chapters 26.44, 43.101, and 74.34 RCW.(d) For purposes of this subsection:(i) "Employee" means a person represented by a certified or recognized union regardless of whether the employee is a member of the union.(ii) "Union" means any lawful organization that has as one of its primary purposes the representation of employees in their employment relations with employers, including without limitation labor organizations defined by 29 U.S.C. Sec. 152(5) and 5 U.S.C. Sec. 7103(a)(4), representatives defined by 45 U.S.C. Sec. 151, and bargaining representatives defined in RCW 41.56.030, and employee organizations as defined in RCW 28B.52.020, 41.59.020, 41.80.005, 41.76.005, 47.64.011, and 53.18.010.(iii) "Union representation" means action by a union on behalf of one or more employees it represents in regard to their employment relations with employers, including personnel matters, grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of employment, conditions of work, or collective bargaining.(iv) "Union representative" means a person authorized by a union to act for the union in regard to union representation.(v) "Communication" includes any oral, written, or electronic communication or document containing such communication.Sec. 33. RCW 18.120.020 and 2024 c 362 s 9 and 2024 c 217 s 6 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Applicant group" includes any health professional group or organization, any individual, or any other interested party which proposes that any health professional group not presently regulated be regulated or which proposes to substantially increase the scope of practice of the profession.(2) "Certificate" and "certification" mean a voluntary process by which a statutory regulatory entity grants recognition to an individual who (a) has met certain prerequisite qualifications specified by that regulatory entity, and (b) may assume or use "certified" in the title or designation to perform prescribed health professional tasks.(3) "Grandfather clause" means a provision in a regulatory statute applicable to practitioners actively engaged in the regulated health profession prior to the effective date of the regulatory statute which exempts the practitioners from meeting the prerequisite qualifications set forth in the regulatory statute to perform prescribed occupational tasks.(4) "Health professions" means and includes the following health and health-related licensed or regulated professions and occupations: Podiatric medicine and surgery under chapter 18.22 RCW; chiropractic under chapter 18.25 RCW; dental hygiene under chapter 18.29 RCW; dentistry under chapter 18.32 RCW; denturism under chapter 18.30 RCW; dental anesthesia assistants under chapter 18.350 RCW; dispensing opticians under chapter 18.34 RCW; hearing instruments under chapter 18.35 RCW; naturopaths under chapter 18.36A RCW; embalming and funeral directing under chapter 18.39 RCW; midwifery under chapter 18.50 RCW; nursing home administration under chapter 18.52 RCW; optometry under chapters 18.53 and 18.54 RCW; ocularists under chapter 18.55 RCW; osteopathic medicine and surgery under chapter 18.57 RCW; pharmacy under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW; medicine under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW; emergency medicine under chapter 18.73 RCW; physical therapy under chapter 18.74 RCW; practical nurses under chapter 18.79 RCW; psychologists under chapter 18.83 RCW; registered nurses under chapter 18.79 RCW; occupational therapists licensed under chapter 18.59 RCW; respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW; veterinarians and veterinary technicians under chapter 18.92 RCW; massage therapists under chapter 18.108 RCW; acupuncturists or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioners licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW; persons registered under chapter 18.19 RCW; persons licensed as mental health counselors((,))or marriage and family therapists((, and social workers)) under chapter 18.225 RCW; persons licensed as social workers under chapter 18.320 RCW; dietitians and nutritionists certified by chapter 18.138 RCW; radiologic technicians under chapter 18.84 RCW; nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter 18.88A RCW; reflexologists certified under chapter 18.108 RCW; medical assistants-certified, medical assistants-hemodialysis technician, medical assistants-phlebotomist, forensic phlebotomist, medical assistant-EMT, and medical assistants-registered certified and registered under chapter 18.360 RCW; licensed behavior analysts, licensed assistant behavior analysts, and certified behavior technicians under chapter 18.380 RCW; music therapists licensed under chapter 18.233 RCW; dental therapists licensed under chapter 18.265 RCW; and anesthesiologist assistants licensed under chapter 18.71D RCW.(5) "Inspection" means the periodic examination of practitioners by a state agency in order to ascertain whether the practitioners' occupation is being carried out in a fashion consistent with the public health, safety, and welfare.(6) "Legislative committees of reference" means the standing legislative committees designated by the respective rules committees of the senate and house of representatives to consider proposed legislation to regulate health professions not previously regulated.(7) "License," "licensing," and "licensure" mean permission to engage in a health profession which would otherwise be unlawful in the state in the absence of the permission. A license is granted to those individuals who meet prerequisite qualifications to perform prescribed health professional tasks and for the use of a particular title.(8) "Practitioner" means an individual who (a) has achieved knowledge and skill by practice, and (b) is actively engaged in a specified health profession.(9) "Professional license" means an individual, nontransferable authorization to carry on a health activity based on qualifications which include: (a) Graduation from an accredited or approved program, and (b) acceptable performance on a qualifying examination or series of examinations.(10) "Public member" means an individual who is not, and never was, a member of the health profession being regulated or the spouse of a member, or an individual who does not have and never has had a material financial interest in either the rendering of the health professional service being regulated or an activity directly related to the profession being regulated.(11) "Registration" means the formal notification which, prior to rendering services, a practitioner shall submit to a state agency setting forth the name and address of the practitioner; the location, nature and operation of the health activity to be practiced; and, if required by the regulatory entity, a description of the service to be provided.(12) "Regulatory entity" means any board, commission, agency, division, or other unit or subunit of state government which regulates one or more professions, occupations, industries, businesses, or other endeavors in this state.(13) "State agency" includes every state office, department, board, commission, regulatory entity, and agency of the state, and, where provided by law, programs and activities involving less than the full responsibility of a state agency.Sec. 34. RCW 18.205.105 and 2023 c 425 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall develop training standards for the creation of a co-occurring disorder specialist enhancement which may be added to the license or registration held by one of the following:(a) Psychologists licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW;(b) Independent clinical social workers licensed under chapter ((18.225))18.320 RCW;(c) Marriage and family therapists licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;(d) Mental health counselors licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW; and(e) An agency affiliated counselor licensed under chapter 18.19 RCW.(2) To obtain the co-occurring disorder specialist enhancement, the applicant must meet training standards and experience requirements. The training standards must be designed with consideration of the practices of the health professions listed in subsection (1) of this section and consisting of ((sixty))60 hours of instruction consisting of (a) ((thirty))30 hours in understanding the disease pattern of addiction and the pharmacology of alcohol and other drugs; and (b) ((thirty))30 hours in understanding addiction placement, continuing care, and discharge criteria, including the American society of addiction medicine criteria; treatment planning specific to substance abuse; relapse prevention; and confidentiality issues specific to substance use disorder treatment.(3) In developing the training standards, the department shall consult with the examining board of psychology established in chapter 18.83 RCW, the Washington state mental health counselors((,))and marriage and family therapists((, and social workers)) advisory committee established in chapter 18.225 RCW, the substance use disorder certification advisory committee established in chapter 18.205 RCW, the Washington state board of governors for licensed social workers established in chapter 18.320 RCW, and educational institutions in Washington state that train psychologists, marriage and family therapists, mental health counselors, independent clinical social workers, and substance use disorder professionals.(4) The department shall approve educational programs that meet the training standards, and must not limit its approval to university-based courses.(5) The secretary shall issue a co-occurring disorder specialist enhancement to any applicant who demonstrates to the secretary's satisfaction that the following requirements have been met:(a) Completion of the training standards;(b) Successful completion of an approved examination based on core competencies of substance use disorder counseling;(c) Successful completion of an experience requirement of:(i) Eighty hours of supervised experience for an applicant listed under subsection (1) of this section with fewer than five years of experience; or(ii) Forty hours of supervised experience for an applicant listed under subsection (1) of this section with five or more years of experience; and(d) Payment of any fees that may be established by the department.(6) An applicant for the co-occurring disorder specialist enhancement may receive supervised experience from any person who meets or exceeds the requirements of a certified substance use disorder professional in the state of Washington and who would be eligible to take the examination required for substance use disorder professional certification.(7) A person who has obtained a co-occurring disorder specialist enhancement may provide substance use disorder counseling services which are equal in scope with those provided by substance use disorder professionals under this chapter, subject to the following limitations:(a) A co-occurring disorder specialist may only provide substance use disorder counseling services if the co-occurring disorder specialist is employed by:(i) An agency that provides counseling services;(ii) A federally qualified health center; or(iii) A hospital;(b) Following an initial intake or assessment, a co-occurring disorder specialist may provide substance use disorder treatment only to clients diagnosed with a substance use disorder and a mental health disorder;(c) Prior to providing substance use disorder treatment to a client assessed to be in need of 2.1 or higher level of care according to American society of addiction medicine criteria, a co-occurring disorder specialist must make a reasonable effort to refer and connect the client to the appropriate care setting, as indicated by the client's American society of addiction medicine level of care; and(d) A co-occurring disorder specialist must comply with rules promulgated by the department under subsection (11) of this section.(8) The secretary shall establish by rule what constitutes adequate proof of meeting the criteria.(9) Applicants are subject to the grounds for denial of a certificate or issuance of a conditional certificate under chapter 18.130 RCW.(10) The department may adopt a fee to defray the cost of regulatory activities related to the issuance of co-occurring disorder specialist enhancements and any related disciplinary activities.(11) The department shall adopt rules regarding the role of co-occurring disorder specialists across the American society of addiction medicine continuum of care.(12) Any increase in fees necessary to cover the cost of regulating co-occurring disorder specialists who receive an enhancement under this section must be borne by persons licensed as psychologists under chapter 18.83 RCW, independent clinical social workers under chapter ((18.225))18.320 RCW, marriage and family therapists under chapter 18.225 RCW, or mental health counselors under chapter 18.225 RCW. The cost of regulating co-occurring disorder specialists who receive an enhancement under this section may not be borne by substance use disorder professionals or substance use disorder professional trainees certified under this chapter and may not be included in the calculation of fees for substance use disorder professionals or substance use disorder professional trainees certified under this chapter.Sec. 35. RCW 19.410.010 and 2025 c 58 s 5085 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Subject to amounts appropriated for this purpose, the psilocybin therapy services pilot program is established within, and administered by, the University of Washington department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences. No later than January 1, 2025, the University of Washington department of psychiatry and behavioral sciences must implement this section.(2) The pilot program must:(a) Offer psilocybin therapy services through pathways approved by the federal food and drug administration, to populations including first responders and veterans who are:(i) 21 years of age or older; and(ii) Experiencing posttraumatic stress disorder, mood disorders, or substance use disorders;(b) Offer psilocybin therapy services facilitated by:(i) ((An advanced social worker, independent clinical social worker, or))A mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;(ii) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW; or(iii) A psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW as defined in RCW 71.05.020; or(iv) An advanced social worker or independent clinical social worker licensed under chapter 18.320 RCW;(c) Ensure psilocybin therapy services are safe, accessible, and affordable;(d) Require an initial assessment to understand participant goals and expectations, and assess the participant's history for any concerns that require further intervention or information before receiving psilocybin therapy services, and an integration session after receiving psilocybin therapy services; and(e) Use outreach and engagement strategies to include participants from communities or demographic groups that are more likely to be historically marginalized and less likely to be included in research and clinical trials represented by race, sex, sexual orientation, socioeconomic status, age, or geographic location.Sec. 36. RCW 43.70.110 and 2025 c 19 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The secretary shall charge fees to the licensee for obtaining a license. Physicians regulated pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW who reside and practice in Washington and obtain or renew a retired active license are exempt from such fees. Municipal corporations providing emergency medical care and transportation services pursuant to chapter 18.73 RCW shall be exempt from such fees, provided that such other emergency services shall only be charged for their pro rata share of the cost of licensure and inspection, if appropriate. The secretary may charge different fees for registered nurses licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, licensed practical nurses licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, and nurses who hold a valid multistate license issued by the state of Washington under chapter 18.80 RCW. The secretary may waive the fees when, in the discretion of the secretary, the fees would not be in the best interest of public health and safety, or when the fees would be to the financial disadvantage of the state.(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, fees charged shall be based on, but shall not exceed, the cost to the department for the licensure of the activity or class of activities and may include costs of necessary inspection.(3) License fees shall include amounts in addition to the cost of licensure activities in the following circumstances:(a) For registered nurses and licensed practical nurses licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, and for nurses who hold a valid multistate license issued by the state of Washington under chapter 18.80 RCW, support of a central nursing resource center as provided in RCW 18.79.202;(b) For all health care providers licensed under RCW 18.130.040, the cost of regulatory activities for retired volunteer medical worker licensees as provided in RCW 18.130.360; and(c) For physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, physician assistants licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, osteopathic physicians licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, naturopaths licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW, podiatrists licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW, chiropractors licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW, psychologists and psychological associates licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW, registered nurses and licensed practical nurses licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, nurses who hold a valid multistate license issued by the state of Washington under chapter 18.80 RCW, optometrists licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW, mental health counselors and mental health counselor associates licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW, massage therapists licensed under chapter 18.108 RCW, advanced social workers licensed under chapter ((18.225))18.320 RCW, independent clinical social workers and independent clinical social worker associates licensed under chapter ((18.225))18.320 RCW, midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW, marriage and family therapists and marriage and family therapist associates licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW, occupational therapists and occupational therapy assistants licensed under chapter 18.59 RCW, dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138 RCW, speech-language pathologists licensed under chapter 18.35 RCW, acupuncturists or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioners licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW, and veterinarians and veterinary technicians licensed under chapter 18.92 RCW, the license fees shall include up to an additional ((twenty-five dollars))$25 to be transferred by the department to the University of Washington for the purposes of RCW 43.70.112.(4) Department of health advisory committees may review fees established by the secretary for licenses and comment upon the appropriateness of the level of such fees.Sec. 37. RCW 43.70.442 and 2025 c 58 s 5094 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Each of the following professionals certified or licensed under Title 18 RCW shall, at least once every six years, complete training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management that is approved, in rule, by the relevant disciplining authority:(i) An adviser or counselor certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;(ii) A substance use disorder professional licensed under chapter 18.205 RCW;(iii) A marriage and family therapist licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;(iv) A mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;(v) An occupational therapy practitioner licensed under chapter 18.59 RCW;(vi) A psychologist licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW;(vii) An advanced social worker or independent clinical social worker licensed under chapter ((18.225))18.320 RCW; and(viii) A social worker associateâadvanced or social worker associateâindependent clinical licensed under chapter ((18.225))18.320 RCW.(b) The requirements in (a) of this subsection apply to a person holding a retired active license for one of the professions in (a) of this subsection.(c) The training required by this subsection must be at least six hours in length, unless a disciplining authority has determined, under subsection (10)(b) of this section, that training that includes only screening and referral elements is appropriate for the profession in question, in which case the training must be at least three hours in length.(d) Beginning July 1, 2017, the training required by this subsection must be on the model list developed under subsection (6) of this section. Nothing in this subsection (1)(d) affects the validity of training completed prior to July 1, 2017.(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection:(i) A professional listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section must complete the first training required by this section by the end of the first full continuing education reporting period after January 1, 2014, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure or certification, whichever occurs later.(ii) Beginning July 1, 2021, the second training for a psychologist, a marriage and family therapist, a mental health counselor, an advanced social worker, an independent clinical social worker, a social worker associate-advanced, or a social worker associate-independent clinical must be either: (A) An advanced training focused on suicide management, suicide care protocols, or effective treatments; or (B) a training in a treatment modality shown to be effective in working with people who are suicidal, including dialectical behavior therapy, collaborative assessment and management of suicide risk, or cognitive behavior therapy-suicide prevention. If a professional subject to the requirements of this subsection has already completed the professional's second training prior to July 1, 2021, the professional's next training must comply with this subsection. This subsection (2)(a)(ii) does not apply if the licensee demonstrates that the training required by this subsection (2)(a)(ii) is not reasonably available.(b)(i) A professional listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section applying for initial licensure may delay completion of the first training required by this section for six years after initial licensure if he or she can demonstrate successful completion of the training required in subsection (1) of this section no more than six years prior to the application for initial licensure.(ii) Beginning July 1, 2021, a psychologist, a marriage and family therapist, a mental health counselor, an advanced social worker, an independent clinical social worker, a social worker associate-advanced, or a social worker associate-independent clinical exempt from his or her first training under (b)(i) of this subsection must comply with the requirements of (a)(ii) of this subsection for his or her first training after initial licensure. If a professional subject to the requirements of this subsection has already completed the professional's first training after initial licensure, the professional's next training must comply with this subsection (2)(b)(ii). This subsection (2)(b)(ii) does not apply if the licensee demonstrates that the training required by this subsection (2)(b)(ii) is not reasonably available.(3) The hours spent completing training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management under this section count toward meeting any applicable continuing education or continuing competency requirements for each profession.(4)(a) A disciplining authority may, by rule, specify minimum training and experience that is sufficient to exempt an individual professional from the training requirements in subsections (1) and (5) of this section. Nothing in this subsection (4)(a) allows a disciplining authority to provide blanket exemptions to broad categories or specialties within a profession.(b) A disciplining authority may exempt a professional from the training requirements of subsections (1) and (5) of this section if the professional has only brief or limited patient contact.(5)(a) Each of the following professionals credentialed under Title 18 RCW shall complete a one-time training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management that is approved by the relevant disciplining authority:(i) A chiropractor licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW;(ii) A naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;(iii) A licensed practical nurse, registered nurse, or advanced practice registered nurse, other than a certified registered nurse anesthetist, licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW;(iv) An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, other than a holder of a postgraduate osteopathic medicine and surgery license issued under RCW 18.57.035;(v) A physical therapist or physical therapist assistant licensed under chapter 18.74 RCW;(vi) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, other than a resident holding a limited license issued under RCW 18.71.095(3);(vii) A physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW;(viii) A pharmacist licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW;(ix) A dentist licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW;(x) A dental hygienist licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;(xi) An athletic trainer licensed under chapter 18.250 RCW;(xii) An optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW;(xiii) An acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;(xiv) A dental therapist licensed under chapter 18.265 RCW; and(xv) A person holding a retired active license for one of the professions listed in (a)(i) through (xiv) of this subsection.(b)(i) A professional listed in (a)(i) through (vii) of this subsection or a person holding a retired active license for one of the professions listed in (a)(i) through (vii) of this subsection must complete the one-time training by the end of the first full continuing education reporting period after January 1, 2016, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure, whichever is later. Training completed between June 12, 2014, and January 1, 2016, that meets the requirements of this section, other than the timing requirements of this subsection (5)(b), must be accepted by the disciplining authority as meeting the one-time training requirement of this subsection (5).(ii) A licensed pharmacist or a person holding a retired active pharmacist license must complete the one-time training by the end of the first full continuing education reporting period after January 1, 2017, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure, whichever is later.(iii) A licensed dentist, a licensed dental hygienist, or a person holding a retired active license as a dentist shall complete the one-time training by the end of the full continuing education reporting period after August 1, 2020, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure, whichever is later. Training completed between July 23, 2017, and August 1, 2020, that meets the requirements of this section, other than the timing requirements of this subsection (5)(b)(iii), must be accepted by the disciplining authority as meeting the one-time training requirement of this subsection (5).(iv) A licensed optometrist or a licensed acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner, or a person holding a retired active license as an optometrist or an acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner, shall complete the one-time training by the end of the full continuing education reporting period after August 1, 2021, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure, whichever is later. Training completed between August 1, 2020, and August 1, 2021, that meets the requirements of this section, other than the timing requirements of this subsection (5)(b)(iv), must be accepted by the disciplining authority as meeting the one-time training requirement of this subsection (5).(c) The training required by this subsection must be at least six hours in length, unless a disciplining authority has determined, under subsection (10)(b) of this section, that training that includes only screening and referral elements is appropriate for the profession in question, in which case the training must be at least three hours in length.(d) Beginning July 1, 2017, the training required by this subsection must be on the model list developed under subsection (6) of this section. Nothing in this subsection (5)(d) affects the validity of training completed prior to July 1, 2017.(6)(a) The secretary and the disciplining authorities shall work collaboratively to develop a model list of training programs in suicide assessment, treatment, and management. Beginning July 1, 2021, for purposes of subsection (2)(a)(ii) of this section, the model list must include advanced training and training in treatment modalities shown to be effective in working with people who are suicidal.(b) The secretary and the disciplining authorities shall update the list at least once every two years.(c) By June 30, 2016, the department shall adopt rules establishing minimum standards for the training programs included on the model list. The minimum standards must require that six-hour trainings include content specific to veterans and the assessment of issues related to imminent harm via lethal means or self-injurious behaviors and that three-hour trainings for pharmacists or dentists include content related to the assessment of issues related to imminent harm via lethal means. By July 1, 2024, the minimum standards must be updated to require that both the six-hour and three-hour trainings include content specific to the availability of and the services offered by the 988 crisis hotline and the behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention system and best practices for assisting persons with accessing the 988 crisis hotline and the system. Beginning September 1, 2024, trainings submitted to the department for review and approval must include the updated information in the minimum standards for the model list as well as all subsequent submissions. When adopting the rules required under this subsection (6)(c), the department shall:(i) Consult with the affected disciplining authorities, public and private institutions of higher education, educators, experts in suicide assessment, treatment, and management, the Washington department of veterans affairs, and affected professional associations; and(ii) Consider standards related to the best practices registry of the American foundation for suicide prevention and the suicide prevention resource center.(d) Beginning January 1, 2017:(i) The model list must include only trainings that meet the minimum standards established in the rules adopted under (c) of this subsection and any three-hour trainings that met the requirements of this section on or before July 24, 2015;(ii) The model list must include six-hour trainings in suicide assessment, treatment, and management, and three-hour trainings that include only screening and referral elements; and(iii) A person or entity providing the training required in this section may petition the department for inclusion on the model list. The department shall add the training to the list only if the department determines that the training meets the minimum standards established in the rules adopted under (c) of this subsection.(e) By January 1, 2021, the department shall adopt minimum standards for advanced training and training in treatment modalities shown to be effective in working with people who are suicidal. Beginning July 1, 2021, all such training on the model list must meet the minimum standards. When adopting the minimum standards, the department must consult with the affected disciplining authorities, public and private institutions of higher education, educators, experts in suicide assessment, treatment, and management, the Washington department of veterans affairs, and affected professional associations.(7) The department shall provide the health profession training standards created in this section to the professional educator standards board as a model in meeting the requirements of RCW 28A.410.226 and provide technical assistance, as requested, in the review and evaluation of educator training programs. The educator training programs approved by the professional educator standards board may be included in the department's model list.(8) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to expand or limit the scope of practice of any profession regulated under chapter 18.130 RCW.(9) The secretary and the disciplining authorities affected by this section shall adopt any rules necessary to implement this section.(10) For purposes of this section:(a) "Disciplining authority" has the same meaning as in RCW 18.130.020.(b) "Training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management" means empirically supported training approved by the appropriate disciplining authority that contains the following elements: Suicide assessment, including screening and referral, suicide treatment, and suicide management. However, the disciplining authority may approve training that includes only screening and referral elements if appropriate for the profession in question based on the profession's scope of practice. The board of occupational therapy may also approve training that includes only screening and referral elements if appropriate for occupational therapy practitioners based on practice setting.(11) A state or local government employee is exempt from the requirements of this section if he or she receives a total of at least six hours of training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management from his or her employer every six years. For purposes of this subsection, the training may be provided in one six-hour block or may be spread among shorter training sessions at the employer's discretion.(12) An employee of a community mental health agency licensed under chapter 71.24 RCW or a chemical dependency program certified under chapter 71.24 RCW is exempt from the requirements of this section if he or she receives a total of at least six hours of training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management from his or her employer every six years. For purposes of this subsection, the training may be provided in one six-hour block or may be spread among shorter training sessions at the employer's discretion.Sec. 38. RCW 43.70.903 and 2023 c 425 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department, in consultation with the workforce training and education coordinating board and the examining board of psychology, shall examine licensure requirements for the following professions to identify changes to statutes and rules that would remove barriers to entering and remaining in the health care workforce and to streamline and shorten the credentialing process:(a) Advanced social workers and independent clinical social workers licensed under chapter ((18.225))18.320 RCW;(b) Marriage and family therapists licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;(c) Mental health counselors licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;(d) Substance use disorder professionals certified under chapter 18.205 RCW; and(e) Psychologists licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW.(2) The licensure requirements to be examined by the department shall include examinations, continuing education requirements, administrative requirements for license application and renewal, English language proficiency requirements, and supervised experience requirements, including supervisor requirements and costs associated with completing supervised experience requirements.(3) When conducting the review required in subsection (1) of this section, the department shall at a minimum consider the following:(a) The availability of peer-reviewed research and other evidence, including requirements in other states, indicating the necessity of specific licensure requirements for ensuring that behavioral health professionals are prepared to practice with reasonable skill and safety;(b) Changes that would facilitate licensure of qualified, out-of-state and international applicants to promote reciprocity, including the adoption of applicable interstate compacts;(c) Changes that would promote greater consistency across licensure requirements for professions licensed under chapters 18.225 and 18.320 RCW and allow for applicants' prior professional experience within relevant fields to be counted towards supervised experience requirements established under chapters 18.225 and 18.320 RCW, including the extent to which an applicant may use prior professional experience gained before graduation from a master's or doctoral level educational program to satisfy the applicant's supervised experience requirement;(d) Technical assistance programs, such as navigators or dedicated customer service lines, to facilitate the completion of licensing applications;(e) In consultation with the examining board of psychology and a statewide organization representing licensed psychologists, the creation of an associate-level license for psychologists;(f) Whether agency affiliated counselors should be allowed to practice in federally qualified health centers; and(g) Any rules that pose excessive administrative requirements for application or renewal or that place a disproportionate burden on applicants from disadvantaged communities.(4) By November 1, 2023, the department shall provide a progress report and initial findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature on actions and recommendations to remove licensing barriers and improve credentialing time frames.(5) By November 1, 2024, the department shall provide a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on actions and recommendations to remove licensing barriers and improve credentialing time frames.Sec. 39. RCW 48.43.087 and 2025 c 58 s 5050 are each amended to read as follows:(1) For purposes of this section:(a) "Health carrier" includes disability insurers regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, health care services contractors regulated under chapter 48.44 RCW, plans operating under the health care authority under chapter 41.05 RCW, the basic health plan operating under chapter 70.47 RCW, the state health insurance pool operating under chapter 48.41 RCW, insuring entities regulated under this chapter, and health maintenance organizations regulated under chapter 48.46 RCW.(b) "Intermediary" means a person duly authorized to negotiate and execute provider contracts with health carriers on behalf of mental health care practitioners.(c) Consistent with their lawful scopes of practice, "mental health care practitioners" includes only the following: Any generally recognized medical specialty of practitioners licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW who provide mental health services, advanced practice psychiatric nurses as authorized by the state board of nursing under chapter 18.79 RCW, psychologists licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW, ((and)) mental health counselors((,))and marriage and family therapists((, and social workers)) licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW, and social workers licensed under chapter 18.320 RCW.(d) "Mental health services" means outpatient services.(2) Consistent with federal and state law and rule, no contract between a mental health care practitioner and an intermediary or between a mental health care practitioner and a health carrier that is written, amended, or renewed after June 6, 1996, may contain a provision prohibiting a practitioner and an enrollee from agreeing to contract for services solely at the expense of the enrollee as follows:(a) On the exhaustion of the enrollee's mental health care coverage;(b) During an appeal or an adverse certification process;(c) When an enrollee's condition is excluded from coverage; or(d) For any other clinically appropriate reason at any time.(3) If a mental health care practitioner provides services to an enrollee during an appeal or adverse certification process, the practitioner must provide to the enrollee written notification that the enrollee is responsible for payment of these services, unless the health carrier elects to pay for services provided.(4) This section does not apply to a mental health care practitioner who is employed full time on the staff of a health carrier.Sec. 40. RCW 70.02.180 and 2001 c 251 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:Mental health counselors((,))and marriage and family therapists((, and social workers)) licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW and social workers licensed under chapter 18.320 RCW are subject to this chapter.Sec. 41. RCW 71.05.765 and 2024 c 366 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:The authority must contract with an association that represents designated crisis responders in Washington to develop and begin delivering by July 1, 2025, a training program for social workers licensed under chapter ((18.225))18.320 RCW who practice in an emergency department with responsibilities related to civil commitments under this chapter. The training must include instruction emphasizing standards and procedures relating to the civil commitment of persons with substance use disorders and mental illness, including which clinical presentations warrant summoning a designated crisis responder. The training must emphasize the manner in which a patient with a primary substance use disorder may present as a risk of harm to self or others, or gravely disabled. Each hospital shall ensure that, by July 1, 2026, or within three months of hire, all social workers employed in the emergency department with responsibilities relating to civil commitments under this chapter complete the training every three years.Sec. 42. RCW 71.24.025 and 2025 c 360 s 17 and 2025 c 346 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "23-hour crisis relief center" means a community-based facility or portion of a facility which is licensed or certified by the department of health and open 24 hours a day, seven days a week, offering access to mental health and substance use care for no more than 23 hours and 59 minutes at a time per patient, and which accepts all behavioral health crisis walk-ins drop-offs from first responders, and individuals referred through the 988 system regardless of behavioral health acuity, and meets the requirements under RCW 71.24.916.(2) "988 crisis hotline" means the universal telephone number within the United States designated for the purpose of the national suicide prevention and mental health crisis hotline system operating through the national suicide prevention lifeline.(3) "Acutely mentally ill" means a condition which is limited to a short-term severe crisis episode of:(a) A mental disorder as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020;(b) Being gravely disabled as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, a gravely disabled minor as defined in RCW 71.34.020; or(c) Presenting a likelihood of serious harm as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in the case of a child, as defined in RCW 71.34.020.(4) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.(5) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for persons with a substance use disorder provided by a treatment program licensed or certified by the department as meeting standards adopted under this chapter.(6) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.(7) "Available resources" means funds appropriated for the purpose of providing community behavioral health programs, federal funds, except those provided according to Title XIX of the Social Security Act, and state funds appropriated under this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW by the legislature during any biennium for the purpose of providing residential services, resource management services, community support services, and other behavioral health services. This does not include funds appropriated for the purpose of operating and administering the state psychiatric hospitals.(8) "Behavioral health administrative services organization" means an entity contracted with the authority to administer behavioral health services and programs under RCW 71.24.381, including crisis services and administration of chapter 71.05 RCW, the involuntary treatment act, for all individuals in a defined regional service area.(9) "Behavioral health aide" means a counselor, health educator, and advocate who helps address individual and community-based behavioral health needs, including those related to alcohol, drug, and tobacco abuse as well as mental health problems such as grief, depression, suicide, and related issues and is certified by a community health aide program of the Indian health service or one or more tribes or tribal organizations consistent with the provisions of 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1616l and RCW 43.71B.010 (7) and (8).(10) "Behavioral health provider" means a person licensed under chapter 18.57, 18.71, 18.71A, 18.83, 18.205, 18.225, 18.320, or 18.79 RCW, as it applies to registered nurses and advanced practice registered nurses.(11) "Behavioral health services" means mental health services, substance use disorder treatment services, and co-occurring disorder treatment services as described in this chapter and chapter 71.36 RCW that, depending on the type of service, are provided by licensed or certified behavioral health agencies, behavioral health providers, or integrated into other health care providers.(12) "Child" means a person under the age of 18 years.(13) "Chronically mentally ill adult" or "adult who is chronically mentally ill" means an adult who has a mental disorder and meets at least one of the following criteria:(a) Has undergone two or more episodes of hospital care for a mental disorder within the preceding two years; or(b) Has experienced a continuous behavioral health hospitalization or residential treatment exceeding six months' duration within the preceding year; or(c) Has been unable to engage in any substantial gainful activity by reason of any mental disorder which has lasted for a continuous period of not less than 12 months. "Substantial gainful activity" shall be defined by the authority by rule consistent with Public Law 92-603, as amended.(14) "Clubhouse" means a community-based program that provides rehabilitation services and is licensed or certified by the department.(15) "Co-response" means a multidisciplinary partnership between first responders and human services professionals that responds to emergency situations involving behavioral health crises and people experiencing complex medical needs. Participants in co-response respond to in-progress 911 calls, 988 calls, and requests for service from dispatch and other first responders and include first responders such as public safety telecommunicators, law enforcement officers, firefighters, emergency medical technicians, and paramedics, and human services professionals such as social workers, behavioral health clinicians, advanced practice registered nurses, registered nurses, community health workers, and peer support specialists.(16) "Community behavioral health program" means all expenditures, services, activities, or programs, including reasonable administration and overhead, designed and conducted to prevent or treat substance use disorder, mental illness, or both in the community behavioral health system.(17) "Community behavioral health service delivery system" means public, private, or tribal agencies that provide services specifically to persons with mental disorders, substance use disorders, or both, as defined under RCW 71.05.020 and receive funding from public sources.(18) "Community support services" means services authorized, planned, and coordinated through resource management services including, at a minimum, assessment, diagnosis, emergency crisis intervention available 24 hours, seven days a week, prescreening determinations for persons who are mentally ill being considered for placement in nursing homes as required by federal law, screening for patients being considered for admission to residential services, diagnosis and treatment for children who are acutely mentally ill or severely emotionally or behaviorally disturbed discovered under screening through the federal Title XIX early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment program, investigation, legal, and other nonresidential services under chapter 71.05 RCW, case management services, psychiatric treatment including medication supervision, counseling, psychotherapy, assuring transfer of relevant patient information between service providers, recovery services, and other services determined by behavioral health administrative services organizations.(19) "Community-based crisis team" means a team that is part of an emergency medical services agency, a fire service agency, a public health agency, a medical facility, a nonprofit crisis response provider, or a city or county government entity, other than a law enforcement agency, that provides the on-site community-based interventions of a mobile rapid response crisis team for individuals who are experiencing a behavioral health crisis.(20) "Consensus-based" means a program or practice that has general support among treatment providers and experts, based on experience or professional literature, and may have anecdotal or case study support, or that is agreed but not possible to perform studies with random assignment and controlled groups.(21) "Coordinated regional behavioral health crisis response system" means the coordinated operation of 988 call centers, regional crisis lines, certified public safety telecommunicators, and other behavioral health crisis system partners within each regional service area.(22) "County authority" means the board of county commissioners, county council, or county executive having authority to establish a behavioral health administrative services organization, or two or more of the county authorities specified in this subsection which have entered into an agreement to establish a behavioral health administrative services organization.(23) "Crisis stabilization services" means services such as 23-hour crisis relief centers, crisis stabilization units, short-term respite facilities, peer-run respite services, and same-day walk-in behavioral health services, including within the overall crisis system components that operate like hospital emergency departments that accept all walk-ins, and ambulance, fire, and police drop-offs, or determine the need for involuntary hospitalization of an individual.(24) "Crisis stabilization unit" has the same meaning as under RCW 71.05.020.(25) "Department" means the department of health.(26) "Designated 988 contact hub" or "988 contact hub" means a state-designated contact center that streamlines clinical interventions and access to resources for people experiencing a behavioral health crisis and participates in the national suicide prevention lifeline network to respond to statewide or regional 988 contacts that meets the requirements of RCW 71.24.890.(27) "Designated crisis responder" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.05.020.(28) "Director" means the director of the authority.(29) "Drug addiction" means a disease characterized by a dependency on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.(30) "Early adopter" means a regional service area for which all of the county authorities have requested that the authority purchase medical and behavioral health services through a managed care health system as defined under RCW 71.24.380(7).(31) "Emerging best practice" or "promising practice" means a program or practice that, based on statistical analyses or a well established theory of change, shows potential for meeting the evidence-based or research-based criteria, which may include the use of a program that is evidence-based for outcomes other than those listed in subsection (32) of this section.(32) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has been tested in heterogeneous or intended populations with multiple randomized, or statistically controlled evaluations, or both; or one large multiple site randomized, or statistically controlled evaluation, or both, where the weight of the evidence from a systemic review demonstrates sustained improvements in at least one outcome. "Evidence-based" also means a program or practice that can be implemented with a set of procedures to allow successful replication in Washington and, when possible, is determined to be cost-beneficial.(33) "First responders" includes ambulance, fire, mobile rapid response crisis team, co-responder team, designated crisis responder, fire department mobile integrated health team, community assistance referral and education services program under RCW 35.21.930, and law enforcement personnel.(34) "Immediate jeopardy" means a situation in which the licensed or certified behavioral health agency's noncompliance with one or more statutory or regulatory requirements has placed the health and safety of patients in its care at risk for serious injury, serious harm, serious impairment, or death.(35) "Indian health care provider" means a health care program operated by the Indian health service or by a tribe, tribal organization, or urban Indian organization as those terms are defined in the Indian health care improvement act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1603).(36) "Intensive behavioral health treatment facility" means a community-based specialized residential treatment facility for individuals with behavioral health conditions, including individuals discharging from or being diverted from state and local hospitals, whose impairment or behaviors do not meet, or no longer meet, criteria for involuntary inpatient commitment under chapter 71.05 RCW, but whose care needs cannot be met in other community-based placement settings.(37) "Licensed or certified behavioral health agency" means:(a) An entity licensed or certified according to this chapter or chapter 71.05 RCW;(b) An entity deemed to meet state minimum standards as a result of accreditation by a recognized behavioral health accrediting body recognized and having a current agreement with the department; or(c) An entity with a tribal attestation that it meets state minimum standards for a licensed or certified behavioral health agency.(38) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington.(39) "Long-term inpatient care" means inpatient services for persons committed for, or voluntarily receiving intensive treatment for, periods of 90 days or greater under chapter 71.05 RCW. "Long-term inpatient care" as used in this chapter does not include: (a) Services for individuals committed under chapter 71.05 RCW who are receiving services pursuant to a conditional release or a court-ordered less restrictive alternative to detention; or (b) services for individuals voluntarily receiving less restrictive alternative treatment on the grounds of the state hospital.(40) "Managed care organization" means an organization, having a certificate of authority or certificate of registration from the office of the insurance commissioner, that contracts with the authority under a comprehensive risk contract to provide prepaid health care services to enrollees under the authority's managed care programs under chapter 74.09 RCW.(41) "Mental health peer-run respite center" means a peer-run program to serve individuals in need of voluntary, short-term, noncrisis services that focus on recovery and wellness.(42) Mental health "treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department of social and health services or the authority, by behavioral health administrative services organizations and their staffs, by managed care organizations and their staffs, or by treatment facilities. "Treatment records" do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the entities listed in this subsection, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others.(43) "Mentally ill persons," "persons who are mentally ill," and "the mentally ill" mean persons and conditions defined in subsections (3), (13), (52), and (53) of this section.(44) "Mobile rapid response crisis team" means a team that provides professional on-site community-based intervention such as outreach, de-escalation, stabilization, resource connection, and follow-up support for individuals who are experiencing a behavioral health crisis, that shall include certified peer counselors or certified peer support specialists as a best practice to the extent practicable based on workforce availability, and that meets standards for response times established by the authority.(45) "Recovery" means a process of change through which individuals improve their health and wellness, live a self-directed life, and strive to reach their full potential.(46) "Regional crisis line" means the behavioral health crisis hotline in each regional service area which provides crisis response services 24 hours a day, seven days a week, 365 days a year including but not limited to dispatch of mobile rapid response crisis teams, community-based crisis teams, and designated crisis responders. A regional crisis line may not dispatch law enforcement.(47) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has been tested with a single randomized, or statistically controlled evaluation, or both, demonstrating sustained desirable outcomes; or where the weight of the evidence from a systemic review supports sustained outcomes as described in subsection (32) of this section but does not meet the full criteria for evidence-based.(48) "Residential services" means a complete range of residences and supports authorized by resource management services and which may involve a facility, a distinct part thereof, or services which support community living, for persons who are acutely mentally ill, adults who are chronically mentally ill, children who are severely emotionally disturbed, or adults who are seriously disturbed and determined by the behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically mentally ill. The services shall include at least evaluation and treatment services as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW, acute crisis respite care, long-term adaptive and rehabilitative care, and supervised and supported living services, and shall also include any residential services developed to service persons who are mentally ill in nursing homes, residential treatment facilities, assisted living facilities, and adult family homes, and may include outpatient services provided as an element in a package of services in a supported housing model. Residential services for children in out-of-home placements related to their mental disorder shall not include the costs of food and shelter, except for children's long-term residential facilities existing prior to January 1, 1991.(49) "Resilience" means the personal and community qualities that enable individuals to rebound from adversity, trauma, tragedy, threats, or other stresses, and to live productive lives.(50) "Resource management services" mean the planning, coordination, and authorization of residential services and community support services administered pursuant to an individual service plan for: (a) Adults and children who are acutely mentally ill; (b) adults who are chronically mentally ill; (c) children who are severely emotionally disturbed; or (d) adults who are seriously disturbed and determined by a behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization to be at risk of becoming acutely or chronically mentally ill. Such planning, coordination, and authorization shall include mental health screening for children eligible under the federal Title XIX early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment program. Resource management services include seven day a week, 24 hour a day availability of information regarding enrollment of adults and children who are mentally ill in services and their individual service plan to designated crisis responders, evaluation and treatment facilities, and others as determined by the behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization, as applicable.(51) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.(52) "Seriously disturbed person" means a person who:(a) Is gravely disabled or presents a likelihood of serious harm to himself or herself or others, or to the property of others, as a result of a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW;(b) Has been on conditional release status, or under a less restrictive alternative order, at some time during the preceding two years from an evaluation and treatment facility or a state mental health hospital;(c) Has a mental disorder which causes major impairment in several areas of daily living;(d) Exhibits suicidal preoccupation or attempts; or(e) Is a child diagnosed by a mental health professional, as defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, as experiencing a mental disorder which is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in family or school or with peers or is clearly interfering with the child's personality development and learning.(53) "Severely emotionally disturbed child" or "child who is severely emotionally disturbed" means a child who has been determined by the behavioral health administrative services organization or managed care organization, if applicable, to be experiencing a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.34 RCW, including those mental disorders that result in a behavioral or conduct disorder, that is clearly interfering with the child's functioning in family or school or with peers and who meets at least one of the following criteria:(a) Has undergone inpatient treatment or placement outside of the home related to a mental disorder within the last two years;(b) Has undergone involuntary treatment under chapter 71.34 RCW within the last two years;(c) Is currently served by at least one of the following child-serving systems: Juvenile justice, child-protection/welfare, special education, or developmental disabilities;(d) Is at risk of escalating maladjustment due to:(i) Chronic family dysfunction involving a caretaker who is mentally ill or inadequate;(ii) Changes in custodial adult;(iii) Going to, residing in, or returning from any placement outside of the home, for example, behavioral health hospital, short-term inpatient, residential treatment, group or foster home, or a correctional facility;(iv) Subject to repeated physical abuse or neglect;(v) Drug or alcohol abuse; or(vi) Homelessness.(54) "State minimum standards" means minimum requirements established by rules adopted and necessary to implement this chapter by:(a) The authority for:(i) Delivery of mental health and substance use disorder services; and(ii) Community support services and resource management services;(b) The department of health for:(i) Licensed or certified behavioral health agencies for the purpose of providing mental health or substance use disorder programs and services, or both;(ii) Licensed behavioral health providers for the provision of mental health or substance use disorder services, or both; and(iii) Residential services.(55) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances.(56) "Tribe," for the purposes of this section, means a federally recognized Indian tribe.Sec. 43. RCW 13.40.162 and 2023 c 449 s 17 and 2023 c 150 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) A juvenile offender is eligible for the special sex offender disposition alternative when:(a) The offender is found to have committed a sex offense, other than a sex offense that is also a serious violent offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030, and the offender has no history of a prior sex offense; or(b) The offender is found to have committed assault in the fourth degree with sexual motivation, and the offender has no history of a prior sex offense.(2) If the court finds the offender is eligible for this alternative, the court, on its own motion or the motion of the state or the respondent, may order an examination to determine whether the respondent is amenable to treatment.(a) The report of the examination shall include at a minimum the following:(i) The respondent's version of the facts and the official version of the facts;(ii) The respondent's offense history;(iii) An assessment of problems in addition to alleged deviant behaviors;(iv) The respondent's social, educational, and employment situation;(v) Other evaluation measures used.The report shall set forth the sources of the evaluator's information.(b) The examiner shall assess and report regarding the respondent's amenability to treatment and relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall be provided and shall include, at a minimum:(i) The frequency and type of contact between the offender and therapist;(ii) Specific issues to be addressed in the treatment and description of planned treatment modalities;(iii) Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members, legal guardians, or others;(iv) Anticipated length of treatment; and(v) Recommended crime-related prohibitions.(c) For good cause shown, the court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the state shall order, a second examination regarding the offender's amenability to treatment. The evaluator shall be selected by the party making the motion.(3) After receipt of reports of the examination, the court shall then consider whether the offender and the community will benefit from use of this special sex offender disposition alternative and consider the victim's opinion whether the offender should receive a treatment disposition under this section. If the court determines that this special sex offender disposition alternative is appropriate, then the court shall impose a determinate disposition within the standard range for the offense, or if the court concludes, and enters reasons for its conclusions, that such disposition would cause a manifest injustice, the court shall impose a disposition under option D, and the court may suspend the execution of the disposition and place the offender on community supervision for at least two years.(4) As a condition of the suspended disposition, the court may impose the conditions of community supervision and other conditions, including up to 30 days of confinement and requirements that the offender do any one or more of the following:(a) Devote time to a specific education, employment, or occupation;(b) Undergo available outpatient sex offender treatment for up to two years, or inpatient sex offender treatment not to exceed the standard range of confinement for that offense. A community mental health center may not be used for such treatment unless it has an appropriate program designed for sex offender treatment. The respondent shall not change sex offender treatment providers or treatment conditions without first notifying the prosecutor, the probation counselor, and the court, and shall not change providers without court approval after a hearing if the prosecutor or probation counselor object to the change;(c) Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the probation counselor prior to any change in the offender's address, educational program, or employment;(d) Report to the prosecutor and the probation counselor prior to any change in a sex offender treatment provider. This change shall have prior approval by the court;(e) Report as directed to the court and a probation counselor;(f) Pay restitution and perform community restitution, or any combination thereof;(g) Make restitution to the victim for the cost of any counseling reasonably related to the offense; or(h) Comply with the conditions of any court-ordered probation bond.(5) If the court orders 24 hour, continuous monitoring of the offender while on probation, the court shall include the basis for this condition in its findings.(6)(a) The court must order the offender not to attend the public or approved private elementary, middle, or high school attended by the victim or the victim's siblings.(b) The parents or legal guardians of the offender are responsible for transportation or other costs associated with the offender's change of school that would otherwise be paid by the school district.(c) The court shall send notice of the disposition and restriction on attending the same school as the victim or victim's siblings to the public or approved private school the juvenile will attend, if known, or if unknown, to the approved private schools and the public school district board of directors of the district in which the juvenile resides or intends to reside. This notice must be sent at the earliest possible date but not later than 10 calendar days after entry of the disposition.(7)(a) The sex offender treatment provider shall submit quarterly reports on the respondent's progress in treatment to the court and the parties. The reports shall reference the treatment plan and include at a minimum the following: Dates of attendance, respondent's compliance with requirements, treatment activities, the respondent's relative progress in treatment, and any other material specified by the court at the time of the disposition.(b) At the time of the disposition, the court may set treatment review hearings as the court considers appropriate.(c) Except as provided in this subsection, examinations and treatment ordered pursuant to this subsection shall be conducted by qualified professionals as described under (d) of this subsection, certified sex offender treatment providers, or certified affiliate sex offender treatment providers under chapter 18.155 RCW.(d) A sex offender therapist who examines or treats a juvenile sex offender pursuant to this subsection does not have to be certified by the department of health pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW if the therapist is a professional licensed under chapter 18.225, 18.320, or 18.83 RCW and the treatment employed is evidence-based for sex offender treatment, or if the court finds that: (i) The offender has already moved to another state or plans to move to another state for reasons other than circumventing the certification requirements; (ii) no certified sex offender treatment providers or certified affiliate sex offender treatment providers are available for treatment within a reasonable geographical distance of the offender's home; and (iii) the evaluation and treatment plan comply with this subsection and the rules adopted by the department of health.(8)(a) If the offender violates any condition of the disposition or the court finds that the respondent is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment, the court may revoke the suspension and order execution of the disposition or the court may impose a penalty of up to 30 days confinement for violating conditions of the disposition.(b) The court may order both execution of the disposition and up to 30 days confinement for the violation of the conditions of the disposition.(c) The court shall give credit for any confinement time previously served if that confinement was for the offense for which the suspension is being revoked.(9) For purposes of this section, "victim" means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the crime charged. "Victim" may also include a known parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor child unless the parent or guardian is the perpetrator of the offense.(10) The respondent or the parent, guardian, or other person having custody of the respondent shall not be required to pay the cost of any evaluation or treatment of the respondent ordered under this section.(11) A disposition entered under this section is not appealable under RCW 13.40.230.Sec. 44. RCW 18.100.050 and 2023 c 60 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) An individual or group of individuals duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the same professional services within this state may organize and become a shareholder or shareholders of a professional corporation for pecuniary profit under the provisions of Title 23B RCW for the purpose of rendering professional service. One or more of the legally authorized individuals shall be the incorporators of the professional corporation.(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, registered architects and registered engineers may own stock in and render their individual professional services through one professional service corporation.(3) Licensed health care professionals, providing services to enrolled participants either directly or through arrangements with a health maintenance organization registered under chapter 48.46 RCW or federally qualified health maintenance organization, may own stock in and render their individual professional services through one professional service corporation.(4) Professionals may organize a nonprofit nonstock corporation under this chapter and chapter 24.03A RCW to provide professional services, and the provisions of this chapter relating to stock and referring to Title 23B RCW shall not apply to any such corporation.(5)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, health care professionals who are licensed or certified pursuant to chapters 18.06, 18.225, 18.22, 18.25, 18.29, 18.34, 18.35, 18.36A, 18.50, 18.53, 18.55, 18.57, 18.59, 18.64, 18.71, 18.71A, 18.74, 18.79, 18.83, 18.89, 18.108, ((and)) 18.138, and 18.320 RCW may own stock in and render their individual professional services through one professional service corporation and are to be considered, for the purpose of forming a professional service corporation, as rendering the "same specific professional services" or "same professional services" or similar terms.(b) Formation of a professional service corporation under this subsection does not restrict the application of the uniform disciplinary act under chapter 18.130 RCW, or applicable health care professional statutes under ((Title 18 RCW))this title, including but not limited to restrictions on persons practicing a health profession without being appropriately credentialed and persons practicing beyond the scope of their credential.Sec. 45. RCW 25.05.510 and 2001 c 251 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person or group of persons licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render professional services, as defined in RCW 18.100.030, within this state may organize and become a member or members of a limited liability partnership under the provisions of this chapter for the purposes of rendering professional service. Nothing in this section prohibits a person duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render professional services in any jurisdiction other than this state from becoming a member of a limited liability partnership organized for the purpose of rendering the same professional services. Nothing in this section prohibits a limited liability partnership from rendering professional services outside this state through individuals who are not duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render such professional services within this state.(2)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, health care professionals who are licensed or certified pursuant to chapters 18.06, 18.225, 18.22, 18.25, 18.29, 18.34, 18.35, 18.36A, 18.50, 18.53, 18.55, 18.64, 18.79, 18.83, 18.89, 18.108, ((and)) 18.138, and 18.320 RCW may join and render their individual professional services through one limited liability partnership and are to be considered, for the purpose of forming a limited liability partnership, as rendering the "same specific professional services" or "same professional services" or similar terms.(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, health care professionals who are licensed pursuant to chapters 18.57 and 18.71 RCW may join and render their individual professional services through one limited liability partnership and are to be considered, for the purpose of forming a limited liability partnership, as rendering the "same specific professional services" or "same professional services" or similar terms.(c) Formation of a limited liability partnership under this subsection does not restrict the application of the uniform disciplinary act under chapter 18.130 RCW, or any applicable health care professional statutes under Title 18 RCW, including but not limited to restrictions on persons practicing a health profession without being appropriately credentialed and persons practicing beyond the scope of their credential.Sec. 46. RCW 49.44.220 and 2022 c 11 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) It is unlawful for an employer to obtain individually identifiable information regarding an employee's participation in an employee assistance program. Individually identifiable information gathered in the process of conducting an employee assistance program must be kept confidential.(b) Subsection (1)(a) of this section does not apply to:(i) Authorized disclosures under RCW 41.04.730;(ii) Disclosures to an employer regarding an employee's attendance in an employee assistance program, which the employee was required to attend as a condition of continued employment; and(((ii) [(iii)]))(iii) Disclosures that are:(A) Made to prevent or lessen a perceived threat to the health or safety of an individual or the public; or(B) Permitted or required under RCW 18.225.105, 70.02.050, ((or)) 71.05.120, or section 11 of this act.(2) An employee's participation or nonparticipation in an employee assistance program must not be a factor in a decision affecting an employee's job security, promotional opportunities, corrective or disciplinary action, or other employment rights.Sec. 47. RCW 74.09.748 and 2018 c 175 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:Upon adoption of a fully integrated managed health care system pursuant to chapter 71.24 RCW, regional service areas:(1) Must allow reimbursement for time spent supervising persons working toward satisfying supervision requirements established for the relevant practice areas pursuant to RCW 18.225.090 and chapter 18.320 RCW; and(2) May allow reimbursement for services delivered through a partial hospitalization or intensive outpatient program as described in RCW 71.24.385.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 48. Sections 2 through 18 take effect July 1, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 49. Sections 19 through 47 of this act take effect July 1, 2027, or later, contingent upon the Washington state board of governors for licensed social workers adopting rules and assuming full regulatory authority from the secretary. The department of health must provide written notice of the effective date of these sections to affected parties, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the department.--- END ---